Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
CHAPTER 2 Condemnation Procedure Generally

Cross references.

Procedure for obtaining private ways, see §

44-9-40

et seq.

Law reviews.

For comment on Georgia Power Co. v. Fountain,

207 Ga. 361

,

61 S.E.2d 454

(1950), see 13 Ga. B.J. 341 (1951).

For comment on State Hwy. Dep’t v. Owens,

120 Ga. App. 647

,

171 S.E.2d 770

(1969), and the right to inquire as to property owner’s knowledge of condemnation prior to making improvements, see 22 Mercer L. Rev. 616 (1971).